Oklahoma, session 2025, SB574.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 30.5, as
last amended by Section 3, Chapter 124, O.S.L. 2024 (74 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 30.5), is amended to read as follows:
Section 30.5. As used in the Political Subdivisions Opioid
Abatement Grants Act:
1. “Approved purpose” and “approved purposes” mean evidence-
based, forward-looking strategies, programming and services used to:

a. expand the availability of treatment for individuals
affected by opioid use disorders, co-occurring
substance use disorders and mental health issues,
b. develop, promote and provide evidence-based opioid use
prevention strategies,
c. provide opioid use disorder and co-occurring substance
use disorder avoidance and awareness education,
d. decrease the oversupply of licit and illicit opioids,
e. support recovery from addiction services performed by
qualified and appropriately licensed providers,
f. treat opioid use, abuse and disorders including early
intervention screening, counseling and support,
g. support individuals in treatment and recovery from
opioid use, abuse and disorder,
h. provide programs or services to connect individuals
with opioid use, abuse or disorder, or who are at risk
of developing opioid use disorder, co-occurring
substance use disorder and mental health issues, with
treatment and counseling programs and services,
i. address the needs of individuals who are involved, or
who are at risk of becoming involved, in the criminal
justice system due to opioid use, abuse or disorder
through programs or services in municipal and county
criminal judicial systems including prearrest and
postarrest diversion programs, pretrial services and
drug or recovery courts,
j. address the needs of pregnant or parenting women with
opioid use, abuse or disorder and their families,
k. address the needs of parents and caregivers caring for
babies with neonatal abstinence syndrome,
ENR. S. B. NO. 574 Page 2

l. support efforts to prevent overprescribing and ensure
appropriate prescribing and dispensing of opioids,
m. support efforts to discourage or prevent misuse of
opioids including the oversupply of licit and illicit
opioids,
n. support efforts to prevent or reduce overdose deaths
or other opioid-related harms including through
increased availability and distribution of naloxone
and other drugs that treat overdoses for use by first
responders, persons who have experienced an overdose
event, families, schools, community-based service
providers, social workers and other members of the
public,
o. reimburse or fund law enforcement and emergency
responder expenditures relating to the opioid epidemic
including costs of responding to emergency medical or
police calls for service, equipment, treatment or
response alternatives, mental health response training
and training for law enforcement and emergency
responders as to appropriate practices and precautions
when dealing with opioids or individuals who are at
risk of opioid overdose or death,
p. reimburse attorney fees and allowable expenses
directly related to opioid litigation incurred as part
of legal services agreements entered into before May
21, 2020,
q. support efforts to provide leadership, planning and
coordination to abate the opioid epidemic through
activities, programs or strategies for prevention and
recovery models including regional intergovernmental
efforts and not-for-profit agency support,
r. support education of youths regarding the dangers of
opioid use, abuse and addiction,
s. fund training relative to any approved purpose,
ENR. S. B. NO. 574 Page 3

t. monitor, surveil and evaluate opioid use, abuse or
disorder,
u. provide educational and health care services related
to nonopioid treatment alternatives, or
v. provide opioid abatement as identified by the Oklahoma
Opioid Abatement Board as consistent with the purpose
of the Political Subdivisions Opioid Abatement Grants
Act.
Provided that, such strategies, programming and services occurred on
or after January 1, 2015.
Approved purpose also includes any approved uses as authorized
by opioid-related settlement agreements in which the State of
Oklahoma is a litigant or participant;
2. “Board” means the Oklahoma Opioid Abatement Board;
3. “Eligible participant” means any political subdivision
impacted by the opioid crisis;
4. “Nonapproved purpose” and “nonapproved purposes” mean
strategies, programming and services not falling within the
definition of approved purpose or approved purposes as defined in
this section;
5. “Opioid funds” means all monetary amounts obtained through a
settlement or judgment by the Attorney General on behalf of this
state related to opioid litigation involving pharmaceutical supply
chain participants including the Purdue Political Subdivisions
Subdivision Fund but excluding all other funds received pursuant to
the Purdue Settlement Agreement;
6. “Opioid grant awards” means grants funded from the Oklahoma
Opioid Abatement Revolving Fund, awarded pursuant to the provisions
of the Political Subdivisions Opioid Abatement Grants Act;
7. “Pharmaceutical supply chain” means the process and channels
through which controlled substances are manufactured, marketed,
promoted, distributed or dispensed;
ENR. S. B. NO. 574 Page 4

8. “Pharmaceutical supply chain participant” means any entity
that engages in or has engaged in the manufacture, marketing,
promotion, distribution or dispensing of an opioid analgesic;
9. “Political subdivision” and “political subdivisions” have
the same meaning as provided in subparagraphs a, b, c and d of
paragraph 11 of Section 152 of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
Political subdivision also means the board of regents or board of
trustees of a state educational institution which is a member of The
Oklahoma State System of Higher Education;
10. “Purdue Political Subdivision Fund” means the Twelve
Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($12,500,000.00) plus any
interest accrued thereon received from the Revive Oklahoma Health
Foundation consisting of funds received from the Purdue Settlement
Agreement designed for distribution to political subdivisions which
have executed a release of legal claims as required by the Purdue
Settlement Agreement; and
11. “Purdue Settlement Agreement” means the settlement
agreement entered into by this state and Purdue Pharma L.P., Purdue
Pharma, Inc. and the Purdue Frederick Company on March 26, 2019, and
approved by the Court on April 2, 2019.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 30.6, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 30.6. A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury
a revolving fund for the Office of the Attorney General to be
designated the “Oklahoma Opioid Abatement Revolving Fund”. The fund
shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,
and shall consist of all opioid funds obtained through a settlement
or judgment by the Attorney General on behalf of the State of
Oklahoma related to opioid litigation involving pharmaceutical
supply chain participants:
1. Designated for deposit in the fund; or
2. Appropriated to the fund by the Legislature.
ENR. S. B. NO. 574 Page 5

B. Provided that the Purdue Political Subdivisions Subdivision
Fund shall be maintained in a segregated State Treasury fund within
the Oklahoma Opioid Abatement Revolving Fund, and that the Purdue
Political Subdivisions Subdivision Fund shall not be commingled with
other opioid funds deposited in or appropriated to the Oklahoma
Opioid Abatement Revolving Fund.
C. The Office of the Attorney General may use not more than ten
percent (10%) of the funds appropriated to the Oklahoma Opioid
Abatement Revolving Fund for statewide opioid abatement projects
that constitute an approved use under the Political Subdivisions
Opioid Abatement Grants Act. The Oklahoma Opioid Abatement Board
shall approve all statewide opioid abatement projects described in
this subsection.
D. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Attorney
General for the purpose of funding opioid grant awards as authorized
by this act the Political Subdivisions Opioid Abatement Grants Act.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 30.8, as
amended by Section 2, Chapter 75, O.S.L. 2022 (74 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 30.8), is amended to read as follows:
Section 30.8. A. 1. The Oklahoma Opioid Abatement Board shall
conduct an initial disbursement one or more disbursements of opioid
grant awards to participating eligible participants. Such opioid
grant awards shall be allocated amongst the different participating
eligible participants based on the following criteria:
a. the number of people per capita suffering from opioid
use disorder in the participating political
subdivision, or in the absence of such information,
the opioid prescription rate in the political
subdivision compared to the national average opioid
prescription rate,
b. the number of opioid overdose deaths in the
participating political subdivision,
c. the amount of opioids distributed within the
participating political subdivision, and
ENR. S. B. NO. 574 Page 6

d. the amount of attorney fees and allowable expenses
associated with legal services agreements directly
related to opioid litigation incurred as part of legal
services agreements entered into before May 21, 2020,
or
e. any other criteria established by the Board.
2. Grant awards shall be subject to legal services agreements
entered into by eligible participants.
3. Initial opioid Opioid grant awards as provided for in this
subsection shall be listed in an opioid grant award distribution
table reviewed and approved by the Board to ensure that such awards
adhere to the criteria adopted by the Board.
B. Following the awarding of opioid grant awards pursuant to
subsection A of this section, any remaining unencumbered balance in
Funds accrued in the Oklahoma Opioid Abatement Revolving Fund shall
be available to the Board to award as grants to eligible
participants; provided such awards shall only be utilized by
eligible participants for approved purposes.
C. In the event an eligible participant merges, dissolves or
ceases to exist, any remaining allocations of an awarded opioid
grant award in excess of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) shall be
reallocated equitably based on the composition of the successor
eligible participant or the successor eligible participants.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 574 Page 7

Passed the Senate the 24th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 574 Page 8